data/sources/glossaries/co/raw/apertium-cos.cos.dix
    <pardef n="v/ulè__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ulè</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulendu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ogliu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oli</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ole</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulemu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulete</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>olenu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ulia</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulii</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulia</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uliamu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uliate</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulianu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>olsi</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulisti</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>olse</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>olsimu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uliste</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>olsenu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>uleraghju</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulerai</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulerà</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uleremu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulerete</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uleranu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>uleria</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ulsutu</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulsuta</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulsute</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ulsuti</l><r>ulè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n/asce__vblex">
      <e><p><l>asce</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>asceraghju</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>asceremu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascerai</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascerete</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascerà</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>asceranu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascerìa</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascerebbi</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascerìamu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascerèbbemu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascerìi</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>asceresti</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascerìate</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascereste</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascerìa</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascerebbe</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascerìanu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascerèbbenu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascemu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ascimu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>asci</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascite</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>asce</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>àscenu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>asci</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>àscimu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>asci</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>àscite</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>asci</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>àscinu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascìi</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascìimu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascisti</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>asciste</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascì</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascinu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascìa</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascìamu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascìi</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascìate</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascìa</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascìanu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascissi</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascìssimu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascissi</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascìssite</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascissi</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascìssinu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ascemu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>asci</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ascite</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>at</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ascendu</l><r>asce<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="vulè"><i>v</i><par n="v/ulè__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nasce"><i>n</i><par n="n/asce__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rinasce"><i>rin</i><par n="n/asce__vblex"/></e>
